Georgia, session 2025_26, SB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing supplements to the salaries of the judges of superior court, the district
attorney, and the chief assistant district attorney of the Flint Judicial Circuit, approved
March 21, 1984 (Ga. L. 1984, p. 705), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 9,
1999 (Ga. L. 1999, p. 4169), is amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 1.1.
The governing authority of Henry County, such county comprising the Flint Judicial
Circuit, shall provide from county funds an annual stipend in addition to the compensation
received from state funds for the chief judge of the superior court in the amount of
S. B. 329
- 1 -

LC 62 0167
$10,000.00 per year, to be paid in 12 equal monthly payments. The stipend provided by
this section shall be in addition to any county supplements provided to each judge of the
superior court."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 329
- 2 -